Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.40.010

Ballots by mail.

Each active registered voter of the state, overseas voter, and service voter shall automatically be issued a mail ballot for each general election, special election, or primary. Overseas voters and service voters are authorized to cast the same ballots, including those for special elections, as a registered voter of the state would receive under this chapter. Each active registered voter shall continue to receive a ballot by mail until the death or disqualification of the voter, cancellation of the voter's registration, or placing the voter on inactive status.

[ 2013 c 11 s 47; 2011 c 10 s 35; 2009 c 369 s 36; 2003 c 111 s 1001. Prior: 2001 c 241 s 1; 1991 c 81 s 29; 1987 c 346 s 9; 1986 c 167 s 14; 1985 c 273 s 1; 1984 c 27 s 1; 1977 ex.s. c 361 s 76; 1974 ex.s. c 35 s 1; 1971 ex.s. c 202 s 37; 1965 c 9 s 29.36.010; prior: 1963 ex.s. c 23 s 1; 1955 c 167 s 2; prior: (i) 1950 ex.s. c 8 s 1; 1943 c 72 s 1; 1933 ex.s. c 41 s 1; 1923 c 58 s 1; 1921 c 143 s 1; 1917 c 159 s 1; 1915 c 189 s 1; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 5280. (ii) 1933 ex.s. c 41 s 2, part; 1923 c 58 s 2, part; 1921 c 143 s 2, part; 1917 c 159 s 2, part; 1915 c 189 s 2, part; RRS s 5281, part. Formerly RCW 29.36.210, 29.36.010.]

NOTES:

Notice to registered poll voters—Elections by mail—2011 c 10: See note following RCW 29A.04.008.

Effective date—1991 c 81: See note following RCW 29A.84.540.

Legislative intent—1987 c 346: "By this act the legislature intends to combine and unify the laws and procedures governing absentee voting. These amendments are intended: (1) To clarify and incorporate into a single chapter of the Revised Code of Washington the preexisting statutes under which electors of this state qualify for absentee ballots under state law, federal law, or a combination of both state and federal law, and (2) to insure uniformity in the application, issuance, receipt, and canvassing of these absentee ballots. Nothing in this act is intended to impose any new requirement on the ability of the registered voters or electors of this state to qualify for, receive, or cast absentee ballots in any primary or election." [ 1987 c 346 s 1.]

Effective date—1987 c 346: "This act shall take effect on January 1, 1988." [ 1987 c 346 s 25.]

Severability—1986 c 167: See note following RCW 29A.16.040.

Effective date—Severability—1977 ex.s. c 361: See notes following RCW 29A.16.040.